Rhode Island, session 2025, SB330.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 44-5-8.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 44-5 entitled "Levy and
Assessment of Local Taxes" is hereby amended to read as follows:
44-5-8.1. Waiver of interest on overdue quarterly tax payments.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter to the contrary, any city or town
may, by ordinance duly enacted, authorize a waiver of interest on one quarter’s overdue property
tax payment and allow the remaining balance of taxes owed to be paid on a quarterly basis if all of
the following conditions are satisfied by the taxpayer:
(1) The property subject to the overdue payment is the residence or commercial property
of the taxpayer and has been for the five (5) years immediately preceding the tax payment which is
overdue.
(2) The request for a waiver of interest is in writing, signed and dated by the taxpayer.
(3) The taxpayer has made timely payments of taxes to the city or town for the five (5)
years immediately preceding the tax payment, which is overdue. The burden of proof of timely
payments shall be upon the taxpayer.
(4) The bill for which the payment is overdue was issued less than two (2) years prior to
the date of the request for a waiver of interest.
(b) In no event shall the waiver of interest on a tax bill exceed five hundred dollars ($500).
Decisions of the tax collector shall be in writing and contain a notice to the city or town council. If
the taxpayer receives an adverse decision from the tax collector, the taxpayer must pay the interest

and may file a claim for reimbursement with the city or town council within ten (10) days of the
decision.
(c) Any request for a waiver of taxes which meets criteria established by this section
pursuant to a duly enacted ordinance shall be granted by the city or town.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001374
========
LC001374 - Page 2 of 3